Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-310
Rates and charges for electric current; rules and regulations of system.

Any irrigation district which shall acquire, establish and operate any electric light and power plant, lines or systems under the provisions of sections 46-301 to 46-315 shall have the power to fix and collect reasonable rates, fees, and charges for electric current, service, equipment, and physical connection sold or furnished to consumers, and to make and enforce reasonable rules and regulations for the operation and conduct of the entire electric light and power system of the district.

Laws 1931, c. 91, § 10, p. 257;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-710;

R.S.1943, § 46-310.